src/fst/stems/subjunctions.lexc
!! # Traveller Norwegian subjunction file

LEXICON cs
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag  **+CS**
+CS: # ;

LEXICON im
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag  **+IM**
+IM: # ;


LEXICON Subjunctions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lists the subjunctions (4 so far)
at cs ;
så cs ;
som cs "som" ;
sikto cs "som, slik som, lik" ;
å im "å" ;
